Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-853
Easement through common elements.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant's obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under sections 76-825 to 76-894 or reserved in the declaration.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 29.